Utah statutes.
53A-1-1106.   Calculation of points earned for students' proficiency in language arts, mathematics, and science.

(1)  A school shall receive points for the proficiency of a school's students in language arts, mathematics, and science as follows:

(a)  A school shall receive one point for each percent of the school's students who take a statewide assessment of language arts achievement and score at or above the proficient level.

(b)  A school shall receive one point for each percent of the school's students who take a statewide assessment of mathematics achievement and score at or above the proficient level.

(c)  A school shall receive one point for each percent of the school's students who take a statewide assessment of science achievement and score at or above the proficient level.

(2)  A school may earn a maximum of 100 points for each of the criteria listed in Subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c).



Amended by Chapter 478, 2013 General Session

